Utah statutes.
36-17-1.   Legislative Process Committee -- Membership.
There is created a Legislative Process Committee.
(1)  The committee shall be composed of eight legislators appointed as
follows:
(a)  three senators, appointed by the president of the Senate, with one
senator from the minority party; and
(b)  five representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives, with two representatives from the minority party.
(2)  The president of the Senate shall designate one of the Senate appointees
as one cochair of the committee and the speaker of the House of
Representatives shall designate one of the House of Representatives appointees
as the other cochair.
(3)  Committee members serve for one year but may be reappointed by the
speaker or president.
(4)  In conducting all of its business, the committee shall comply with the
rules of legislative interim committees.
(5)  The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall provide
staff services to the committee.
